Utah statutes.
26-6-4.   Involuntary examination, treatment, isolation, and quarantine.

(1)  The following individuals or groups of individuals are subject to examination, treatment, quarantine, or isolation under a department order of restriction:

(a)  an individual who is infected or suspected to be infected with a communicable disease that poses a threat to the public health and who does not take action as required by the department or the local health department to prevent spread of the disease;

(b)  an individual who is contaminated or suspected to be contaminated with an infectious agent that poses a threat to the public health and that could be spread to others if remedial action is not taken;

(c)  an individual who is in a condition or suspected condition which, if exposed to others, poses a threat to public health, or is in a condition which if treatment is not completed will pose a threat to public health; and

(d)  an individual who is contaminated or suspected to be contaminated with a chemical or biological agent that poses a threat to the public health and that could be spread to others if remedial action is not taken.

(2)  If an individual refuses to take action as required by the department or the local health department to prevent the spread of a communicable disease, infectious agent, or contamination, the department or the local health department may order involuntary examination, treatment, quarantine, or isolation of the individual and may petition the district court to order involuntary examination, treatment, quarantine, or  isolation in accordance with Title 26, Chapter 6b, Communicable Diseases - Treatment, Isolation, and Quarantine Procedures.

